District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-302.09

Credit for payments.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 209, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(3)(D), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
This section is referenced in § 46-302.07.
1981 Ed., § 30-342.9.
D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “Amounts collected and credited for a particular period pursuant to a support order issued by a tribunal of another state must be credited against the amounts accruing or accrued for the same period under a support order issued by the tribunal of the District.”
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 209 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).